Tennessee, session 114, SB1937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-804(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(14) The commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services or the
commissioner's designee;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-804(b)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "subdivisions (a)(1)-(5)" wherever it appears and substituting "subdivisions (a)(1)-(5)
and (a)(14)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-809, is amended by deleting
"child protective teams," and substituting "child protective teams or the provision of services to
dependent and neglected youth,".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-809(1), is amended by deleting
"a second or subsequent incident of severe child abuse" and substituting "a case being
reviewed by the commission".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-809(2), is amended by deleting
"concerning a second or subsequent incident of severe abuse" and substituting "being reviewed
by the commission".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-3-809, is amended by designating
the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following subsection (b):
SB1937
011115
- 1 -

(b) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the commission may request
and have access to any records held by a state agency that are necessary for
performance of the commission's duties and responsibilities under this part.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-102(b)(28)(A)(i), is amended by
deleting "abuse, neglect, or use of force" and substituting "abuse, neglect, use of force, or
strangulation, as defined in § 39-13-102(a)(2)".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-402(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "involved the infliction of torture" and substituting "involved strangulation, as defined in
§ 39-13-102(a)(2), or the infliction of torture".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-506, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(e) If a law enforcement officer receives a report of a violation of subsection (b)
or (c), then the law enforcement officer shall refer the victim to the child advocacy center
serving that geographical area for a forensic interview and notify the child protective
team, established pursuant to § 37-1-607, of the reported child sexual abuse.
SECTION 10. Sections 1-6 and 9 of this act take effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it. For all other sections, this act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare
requiring it.
- 2 - 011115